California statutes. Insurance Code
The constitution and laws of the society may provide that no subordinate body, nor any of its subordinate officers or members shall have the power or authority to waive any of the provisions of the laws and constitution of the society. Such provision shall be binding on the society and every member and beneficiary of a member.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11072.

A domestic society may, by a reinsurance agreement, cede any individual risk or risks in whole or in part to an insurer having the power to make such reinsurance and authorized to do business in this State, or if not so authorized, one which is approved by the commissioner; but no such society may reinsure substantially all of its insurance in force without the written permission of the commissioner. It may take credit for the reserves on such ceded risks to the extent reinsured, but no credit shall be allowed as an admitted asset or as a deduction from liability, to a ceding society for reinsurance made, ceded, renewed, or otherwise becoming effective after the effective date of this chapter, unless the reinsurance is payable by the assuming insurer on the basis of the liability of the ceding society under the contract or contracts reinsured without diminution because of the insolvency of the ceding society.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11073.

If the contract of a society entered into, amended, or renewed in this state on or after the effective date of this section provides in any manner for coverage for an employee and a covered spouse dependent upon such employee, the contract shall not provide for coverage under conditions less favorable for employees than coverage provided for covered spouses dependent upon the employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 59.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Powers of Commissioner [11090. - 11112.]

11090.

Subject to the annual fee provisions as provided herein, every certificate of authority issued to a fraternal benefit society shall be for an indefinite term and shall expire with the expiration or termination of the corporate existence of the holder thereof unless sooner revoked by the commissioner. The commissioner shall require the payment of seven thousand fifty-five dollars ($7,055), in advance, as a fee for filing an application for each original certificate of authority authorizing any fraternal benefit society to transact insurance in this state. Each society possessing a certificate of authority of indefinite term shall owe and pay an annual fee of four hundred twenty-four dollars ($424), in advance, on account of that certificate until its final expiration or revocation. That fee shall be for annual
 periods commencing on July 1 of each year, and ending on June 30 of each year, and shall be due on each March 1 and shall be delinquent on and after each April 1. A duly certified copy or duplicate of the certificate of authority shall be prima facie evidence that the holder is a fraternal benefit society within the meaning of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 66.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11091.

No foreign or alien society shall transact business in this State without a certificate of authority issued by the commissioner. Any such society may receive a certificate of authority to transact business in this State upon a showing that its assets are invested in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and filing with the commissioner:

(a) A duly certified copy of its charter or articles of incorporation;

(b) A copy of its constitution and laws, certified by its secretary or corresponding officer;

(c) A power of attorney to the commissioner as prescribed in Section 11104;

(d) A statement of its business under oath of its president and secretary or corresponding officers in a form prescribed by the commissioner, duly verified by an examination made by the supervising insurance official of its home state or other state satisfactory to the commissioner;

(e) A valuation report prepared and executed in accordance with Section 11133 of this chapter;

(f) A certificate from the proper official of its home state, territory, province or country that the society is legally incorporated and licensed to transact business therein;

(g) Copies of its certificate forms;

(h) Such other information as the commissioner may deem necessary to a proper exhibit of its plan of operation; and

(i) Payment of the fee specified in Section 11090.

Any foreign or alien society desiring admission to this State shall have the qualifications required of domestic societies organized under this chapter.

If the commissioner refuses to issue such license, he shall reduce his refusal to writing, file the same in his office and furnish a copy thereof, together with a statement of his reason therefor, to the secretary or corresponding officer of the society.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11092.

The commissioner shall act as prescribed in Section 11093 when upon investigation he finds that a domestic society:

(a) Has exceeded its power;

(b) Has failed to comply with any provision of this chapter;

(c) Is not fulfilling its contracts in good faith;

(d) Has a membership of less than 400 after an existence of one year; or

(e) Is transacting business fraudulently or in a manner hazardous to its members, creditors, the public or the business.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11093.

(a) If the commissioner finds that any of the conditions set forth in Section 11092 exist in respect to a domestic society, he or she shall, in an order to show cause, notify the society of his or her findings and wherein those conditions exist and shall set a date after a reasonable period of time on which it shall show cause why it should not be enjoined from carrying on any business until the overt act or violation complained of shall have been corrected, or why an action in quo warranto should not be commenced against the society.

(b) If on such date the society does not present good and sufficient reason why it should not be so enjoined or why such action should not be
 commenced, the commissioner may present the facts relating thereto to the Attorney General who shall, if he or she deems the circumstances warrant, commence an action to enjoin the society from transacting business or in quo warranto.

(c) The court shall thereupon notify the society of a hearing. If after a full hearing it appears that the society should be so enjoined or liquidated or a receiver appointed, the court shall enter the necessary order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 426, Sec. 8.   (SB 712)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

11094.

If the court orders the society enjoined, the commissioner shall suspend its certificate of authority. Thereafter such society shall have no authority to do business in this State until:

(a) The commissioner finds that the overt act or violation complained of has been corrected;

(b) The costs of such action, if any, have been paid by the society;

(c) The court has dissolved its injunction; and

(d) The commissioner has reinstated the certificate of authority.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11095.

If the court orders the society liquidated, it shall be enjoined from carrying on any further business, whereupon the receiver of the society shall proceed at once to take possession of the books, papers, money and other assets of the society and, under the direction of the court, proceed forthwith to close the affairs of the society and to distribute its funds to those entitled thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11096.

The provisions of Sections 11093 to 11095 relating to hearing by the commissioner, action by the Attorney General at the request of the commissioner, hearing by the court, injunction and receivership shall be applicable to a society which shall voluntarily determine to discontinue business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11097.

The commissioner shall act as prescribed in Section 11098 when upon investigation he finds that a foreign or alien society transacting or applying to transact business in this State:

(a) Has exceeded its powers;

(b) Has failed to comply with any provisions of this chapter;

(c) Is not fulfilling its contracts in good faith; or

(d) Is conducting its business fraudulently or in a manner hazardous to its members or creditors or the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11098.

If the commissioner finds that any of the conditions set forth in Section 11097 exist in respect to a foreign or alien society, he shall, in an order to show cause, notify the society of his findings wherein such conditions exist and shall set a date after a reasonable period of time on which it shall show cause why its certificate of authority should not be suspended, revoked or refused. If on such date the society does not present good and sufficient reason why its authority to do business in this State should not be suspended, revoked or refused, he may suspend or refuse the certificate of authority of the society to do business in this State until satisfactory evidence is furnished to him that such suspension or refusal should be withdrawn or he may revoke the authority of the society to do business in this State. Nothing contained in this section shall be taken or construed as preventing any such society from continuing in good faith all contracts made in this State during the time it was legally authorized to transact business herein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11099.

Article 14 (commencing with Section 1010) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 applies to any society, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 109.)
-------------------------------------------

11100.

Every society operating under the provisions of this chapter and issuing a policy or certificate of insurance may appoint agents to represent it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11101.

Except as otherwise provided in Sections 11102 and 11103, such agents and such societies are subject to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1621) of Part 2 of Division 1 and those agents shall be licensed as life agents. Those agents are also subject to Sections 750, 751, and 760.5, and the terms “insurance agent” and “life agent” as used in those sections include the agents of those societies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 110.)
-------------------------------------------

11102.

Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1621) of Part 2 of Division 1 does not apply to any of the following, nor shall any of the following be required to be licensed as life agents:

(a) Any officer of a local lodge of a society, while acting as such, if that officer (1) does not effect insurance, (2) solicits or negotiates only as a part of, and in connection with, the business of a fraternal agent licensed in accordance with the provisions of Section 11101, and (3) is not remunerated on a commission basis.

(b) Any member of a society who does not effect insurance and whose solicitation or negotiation is incidental to the securing of new members for the society and whose only remuneration therefor consists of prizes in the form of merchandise or payments of a nominal amount. This subdivision does not exempt from the provisions of Chapter 5 nor from the license requirement of Section 11101 any person remunerated on a regular salary or commission basis or employed either full or part time for the purpose of soliciting or negotiating fraternal benefit insurance.

(c) Any person directly employed by a society at the home or a branch office thereof who does not solicit or negotiate fraternal benefit insurance and who receives no commissions but who may, as a part of his or her regular employment, sign policies, certificates, or other evidences of fraternal benefit insurance.

(d) Any person whose employment does not include the solicitation, negotiation, or effecting of fraternal benefit insurance contracts and who does not sign policies, certificates, or any other evidences of those contracts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 111.)
-------------------------------------------

11103.

(a) The examination requirements of Article 7 (commencing with Section 1675) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 1 shall not apply to a license to represent a fraternal benefit society if the individual insurance licensee of a society meets either of the following conditions: 

(1) Was in the service of a society on March 1, 1945, and licensed to represent a fraternal benefit society on January 1, 1952, and continuously thereafter.

(2) Does not devote substantially full time to the sale of life insurance, accident and health or sickness insurance, or both, as provided in Section 1622, and is an individual part-time fraternal licensee, whether that insurance is provided by insurance
 policies or by fraternal benefit policies or certificates. 

(b) If an individual that is exempt from the examination requirements described in subdivision (a) and meets the condition described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) later intends, after securing a license pursuant to this section, to devote substantially full time to the sale of life insurance, accident and health or sickness insurance, or both, the society shall give notice to the commissioner.

(c) (1) Upon receiving notice, the commissioner shall send to the individual part-time fraternal insurance licensee a notice specifying when the examination fee shall be paid and when, not sooner than one month nor later than three months, the licensee shall qualify by examination. Failure to pass the examination or failure to appear pursuant to the commissioner’s notification shall result in a
 termination 45 days thereafter of all license privileges unless the licensee passes the examination within the 45-day period. The individual part-time fraternal insurance licensee shall not be permitted to retake the examination more than twice within that 45-day period.

(2) Following termination pursuant to paragraph (1), the individual may remain licensed as a part-time fraternal insurance licensee until the licensee files a new application for the license and does either of the following: 

(A) Takes and passes the qualifying examination to become a life insurance agent, accident and health or sickness insurance agent, or both.

(B) Demonstrates affirmatively to the commissioner that the individual will no longer devote substantially full time to the sale of life insurance, accident and health or sickness insurance,
 or both, to retain the individual part-time fraternal insurance license.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 558, Sec. 23.   (AB 487)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

11104.

Every society authorized to do business in this State shall appoint in writing the commissioner and each successor in office to be its true and lawful attorney upon whom all lawful process in any action or proceeding against it shall be served, and shall agree in such writing that any lawful process against it which is served on said attorney shall be of the same legal force and validity as if served upon the society, and that the authority shall continue in force so long as any liability remain outstanding in this State. Copies of such appointment, certified by said commissioner, shall be deemed sufficient evidence thereof and shall be admitted in evidence with the same force and effect as the original thereof might be admitted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11105.

Service may be made as provided in Article 1 (commencing with Section 12919) of Chapter 2 of Division 3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 949.)
-------------------------------------------

11106.

An application for injunction against, proceedings for the dissolution of, or the appointment of a receiver for, any domestic society or branch thereof shall not be entertained by any court unless made by the Attorney General.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11107.

A fraternal benefit society, its members, employees, agents, delegates, directors, and officers by whatever name known are subject to Section 12924.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 113.)
-------------------------------------------

11108.

Any domestic society may be converted into and receive a certificate of authority as a mutual life insurance company by compliance with all of the requirements of the laws of this State pertaining to mutual life insurance companies, provided that the plan for such conversion has been approved by the commissioner. Such plan shall be prepared in writing, setting forth in full the terms and conditions thereof. The board of directors, or other executive body charged with the responsibility for the management of the society’s affairs, shall submit such plan to the supreme legislative and governing body of such association or society at any regular or special meeting thereof, by giving a full, true and correct copy of such plan of proposed conversion with the notice of such meeting. Such notice shall be given as provided in the laws of the society for the convocation of such supreme legislative and governing body in regular or special session, as the case may be. The affirmative votes of two-thirds of all members of such supreme legislative and governing body shall be necessary for the approval of such agreement. Such plan shall also have been approved by the vote of the majority of the members who vote at a meeting called for that purpose. Notice of such meeting of members together with a full, true and correct copy of such plan of proposed conversion shall be given by mailing such notice from the head office of the society at least 30 days prior to such meeting in a sealed envelope, postage prepaid, addressed to each member at his last known post-office address. Such members may vote either in person or by mail on ballots furnished by the society. No such conversion shall take effect unless and until approved by the commissioner. The commissioner may give such approval if he finds that the proposed change is in conformity with the requirements of law and is not prejudicial to the certificate holders of the society. Such action in approving or disapproving shall be subject to judicial review.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11109.

On such conversion:

(a) Except as provided in (b) hereof all funds, assets and liabilities of any nature which theretofore were the funds, assets or liabilities of such society shall become the funds, assets and liabilities of such mutual life insurance company. In determining whether such mutual life insurance company meets the minimum capital and surplus requirements of this code, the commissioner shall consider such funds to be those of such mutual life insurance company. Such conversion shall likewise extinguish the assessment liability, if any, of the members, certificate holders or beneficiaries of such society.

(b) If by reason of any contract right in any member, certificate holder or beneficiary which exists on the effective date of this chapter, the transfer of such funds or assets would violate such right then the assets or funds as to which such contract right pertains shall be segregated and held to discharge the liabilities of such mutual life insurance company to the persons entitled thereto. In this case such separate funds shall not be considered by the commissioner in determining if such mutual life insurance company meets minimum capital and surplus requirements, and the assessment liability, if any, of such member, certificate holder or beneficiary is not extinguished.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11110.

In addition to any other ground for disapproving such conversion, the commissioner may refuse to give such approval unless evidence satisfactory to him is submitted that:

(a) The reserves on all certificates theretofore issued are sufficient to carry them to maturity either by reason of the amount thereof or by reason of action by such society pursuant to either subsection (c) hereof or Section 11111;

(b) The plan of conversion will result in the availability of all funds and assets of the mutual life insurance company to the carrying out of the contracts of insurance whether transacted before or after conversion; and

(c) The society has lawfully amended all outstanding certificates on which the member’s contribution was inadequate to carry such certificate to maturity without assessment. Such amendment shall accomplish that purpose by either increasing the amount of contribution or premium, by whatever name known, sufficiently or, at the option of the certificate holder, reducing the amount of his benefits sufficiently.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11111.

Any society may comply with subsection (a) of Section 11110 by deducting from its surplus an amount which, when added to the reserves on certificates theretofore issued, shall be sufficient to carry such certificates to maturity and establish and maintain after its conversion into a mutual life insurance company a special reserve in such an amount. The basis of such special reserve shall not be altered without the prior written consent of the commissioner. The commissioner shall give such consent only when he finds that such alteration will not impair nor imperil the purpose for which such special reserve is established. Any impairment of such reserve shall, to the extent thereof, be deemed a deficiency of required reserves and shall render the mutual life insurance company insolvent. No part of such special reserve shall be deemed to be a part of the capital paid in or of the surplus of the mutual life insurance company.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11112.

All decisions and findings of the commissioner made under the provisions of this chapter shall be subject to review by proper proceedings in any court of competent jurisdiction in this State.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Financial Matters [11120. - 11146.]

11120.

When a society, or a class or section thereof, has assets equal to the reserves and credits on its policies, it may collect periodical or other contributions from the members of the society, class or section which, with interest accretions, will be sufficient to accomplish all the following:

(a) Pay the claims arising from its policies.

(b) Pay for the expense of management of the society.

(c) Maintain a fund sufficient to meet its accrued liabilities.

(d) Maintain assets equal to the reserves and credits.

Societies not operating pursuant to this section shall comply with Section 11121.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11121.

Unless it operates under Section 11120, a society, or class or section thereof, shall collect from its members both stated contributions expressly segregated for the mortuary or disability funds and stated contributions expressly segregated for the expense or management funds. Both of such contributions may be included in the member’s periodical payment to the society. The society shall not use the money in the mortuary or disability funds nor the interest accretions thereon for expense purposes.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11122.

Any society may create, maintain, invest, disburse and apply any special fund or funds necessary to carry out any purpose permitted by the laws of the society. The funds may include hospital and help, sanitaria, home, thrift, pension for the society’s employees, patriotic, educational and relief funds, in accordance with the society’s laws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 166, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

11122.1.

A society may, if authorized by a resolution of its supreme legislative or governing body, establish and operate one or more separate accounts and issue contracts on a variable basis to persons as specified in Section 11041, subject to compliance with the applicable laws. To the extent a society finds it necessary to comply with federal or state law, or regulations issued under state or federal law, a society may do the following:

(a) Adopt special procedures for conducting the business of the separate account.

(b) Provide special voting and other rights for a person with a beneficial interest in the special account, including, but not limited to, rights and procedures relating to investment policy, investment advisory services, selecting certified public accountants, and selecting a committee to manage the account.

(c) Issue contracts on a variable basis that are exempted from the requirements of Sections 11062, 11064, and 11065.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 166, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

11123.

Any such society may own real estate and buildings within or without the state of its incorporation, for any purposes for which it may use funds. It may receive gifts and bequests for such purposes and may be named in policies as beneficiary in trust for such purposes.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11124.

Unless otherwise provided in the contracts of the members, such funds shall be held, invested, and disbursed for the use and benefit of the society, and no member or beneficiary shall have or acquire individual rights therein or become entitled to any apportionment thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11125.

Every domestic society shall invest its funds only in securities permitted by the laws of this State for the investment of the assets of life insurers issuing nonassessable policies on a reserve basis. Such securities shall be valued according to the methods used in valuing similar securities held by such insurers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11126.

An admitted foreign society shall invest its funds either under the same restrictions as domestic societies or in accordance with the laws of the state in which it is incorporated. Any admitted foreign society may deposit securities in accordance with the laws of any state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11127.

An admitted foreign society organized under the laws of any jurisdiction other than a state of the United States shall at all times maintain with a trustee in the United States, in trust for the benefit and security of all its policyholders and creditors in the United States, assets as prescribed in Section 11128. Such assets are designated “trusteed assets.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11128.

The value of the trusteed assets referred to in Section 11127 shall be equal to the sum of all of the following:

(a) All of the indebtedness of that society in the United States having a fixed maturity.

(b) The percentage, specified in subdivision (c), of that part of the tabular reserve which is applicable to its United States business in force.

(c) If the valuation report prescribed by Section 11133 indicates that the degree of actuarial solvency of the society is 100 percent or greater, the percentage prescribed in subdivision (b) is 100 percent. Otherwise the percentage prescribed in subdivision (b) is that percentage, less than 100 percent, which is indicated in the valuation report to be the degree of that society’s actuarial solvency. The society may maintain those trusteed assets in excess of the value herein prescribed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 114.)
-------------------------------------------

11129.

The provisions of Sections 1596 to 1598, inclusive, shall apply to such society specified in Section 11127 and to the matters set forth in Sections 11127 and 11128.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11130.

The commissioner may require any society specified in Section 11127 to file with him annually and at such other times as he may determine, and in such form as he may prescribe, a statement showing the extent to which such society’s policyholders and creditors in the United States are protected by trusteed assets in the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11131.

Every society transacting business in this state shall annually, on or before the first day of March, unless for cause shown such time has been extended by the commissioner, file with the commissioner, in such form as he may require, a statement under oath of its president, secretary or treasurer, or corresponding officers, of its affairs, financial condition and operations during the calendar year ending on the thirty-first day of December last preceding. Such statement shall contain items showing the reserve liabilities on all outstanding certificates classified according to the various mortality standards and interest assumptions for such certificates. The commissioner is authorized and empowered to address any additional inquiries to any such society in relation to its doings or condition, or any other matter connected with its transaction relative to the business contemplated by this chapter, and such officers of such society, as the commissioner may require, shall promptly reply in writing, and under oath, if so required to all such inquiries.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1131, Sec. 17.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 29 of Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------

11132.

A synopsis of its annual statement and valuation report providing an explanation of the facts concerning the condition of the society thereby disclosed shall be printed and mailed to each benefit member of the society not later than June 1st of each year, or, in lieu thereof, such synopsis may be published in the society’s official paper and the issue containing same mailed to each benefit member of the society.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11133.

In addition to the annual report required by Section 11131, each society shall annually, on or before the first day of March, file with the commissioner a valuation of its certificates in force on December 31st last preceding: Provided, the commissioner may, in his discretion for cause shown, extend the time for filing such valuation for not more than two calendar months. Such report of valuation shall show, as reserve liabilities, the difference between the present mid-year value of the promised benefits provided in the certificates of such society in force and the present mid-year value of the future net rates as the same are in practice actually collected, not including therein any value for the right to make extra assessments and not including any amount by which the present mid-year value of future net contributions exceeds the present mid-year value of promised benefits on individual certificates. At the option of any society, in lieu of the above, the valuation may show the net tabular value which, in the case of monthly contributions, may be the means of the terminal reserve values for the end of the preceding and of the current certificate years. Such net tabular value as to certificates issued prior to the effective date of this chapter shall be determined in accordance with the provisions of law applicable thereto as of the date of issuance thereof and as to certificates issued on or after said date shall be not less than the reserves determined according to the commissioners’ reserve valuation method as hereinafter defined. If the rate or payment (by whatever name known) charged is less than the tabular net rate according to the basis of the valuation used, an additional reserve equal to the present value of the deficiency in such rates shall be set up and maintained as a liability.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11134.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 10489.6, reserves according to the commissioners’ reserve valuation method, for the life insurance and endowment benefits of certificates providing for a uniform amount of insurance and requiring the payment of uniform rates shall be the excess, if any, of the present value, at the date of valuation, of such future guaranteed benefits provided for by such certificates, over the then present value of any future modified net rates therefor. The modified net rates for any such certificate shall be such uniform percentage of the respective contract payment for such benefits that the present value, at the date of issue of the certificate, of all such modified net rates shall be equal to the sum of the then present value of such benefits provided for by the certificate and the excess of (a) over (b), as follows:

(a) A net level annual payment equal to the present value at the date of issue, of such benefits provided for after the first certificate year, divided by the present value, at the date of issue, of an annuity of one per annum payable on the first and each subsequent anniversary of such certificate on which a payment falls due; provided, however, that such net level annual payment shall not exceed the net level annual payment on the 19-year payment whole life plan for insurance of the same amount at an age one year higher than the age at issue of such certificate.

(b) A net one-year term payment for such benefits provided for in the first certificate year.

Provided that for any certificate issued on or after January 1, 1986, for which the contract premium in the first policy year exceeds that of the second year and for which no comparable additional benefit is provided in the first year for such excess and which provides an endowment benefit or a cash surrender value or a combination thereof in an amount greater than such excess premium, the reserve according to the commissioners reserve valuation method as of any policy anniversary occurring on or before the assumed ending date defined herein as the first policy anniversary on which the sum of any endowment benefit and any cash surrender value then available is greater than such excess premium shall be the greater of the reserve as of such policy anniversary calculated as described in the preceding paragraph and the reserve as of such policy anniversary calculated as described in that paragraph, but with (i) the value defined in subdivision (a) of that paragraph being reduced by 15 percent of the amount of such excess first year premium, (ii) all present values of benefits and premiums being determined without reference to premiums or benefits provided for by the policy after the assumed ending date, (iii) the policy being assumed to mature on such date as an endowment, and (iv) the cash surrender value provided on such date being considered as an endowment benefit. In making the above comparison the mortality and interest bases stated in Sections 11136 and 11136.1 shall be used.

Reserves according to the commissioners’ reserve valuation method for (1) life insurance certificates providing for a varying amount of insurance or requiring the payment of varying rates, (2) group annuity and pure endowment contracts purchased under a retirement plan or plan of deferred compensation, established or maintained by an employer (including a partnership or sole proprietorship) or by an employee organization, or by both, other than a plan providing individual retirement accounts or individual retirement annuities under Section 408 of the Internal Revenue Code, as now or hereafter amended, (3) disability and accidental death benefits in all certificates and contracts, and (4) all other benefits, except life insurance and endowment benefits in life insurance certificates, shall be calculated by a method consistent with the principles of the first paragraph of this section, except that any extra premiums charged because of impairments or special hazards shall be disregarded in the determination of modified net premiums.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 940, Sec. 7.   Effective September 13, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

11135.

The present value of deferred payments due under incurred claims or matured certificates shall be deemed a liability of the society and shall be computed upon the mortality and interest basis assumed by the society for such valuation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

11136.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 10489.4, such valuation shall be certified by a competent actuary or, at the expense of the society, verified by the actuary of the insurance supervisory official of the state of domicile of the society, and the legal minimum standard of valuation shall be as follows:

(a) All benefits promised by certificates issued prior to September 22, 1952, and the rates therefor shall be valued in accordance with the provisions of law applicable thereto as of the date of issuance, but not lower than the standards and interest assumptions used in the calculation of rates for such benefits.

(b) The minimum standard for the valuation of all certificates
 issued after September 21, 1952, and prior to January 1, 1972, shall be 3 percent per annum interest; in the case of certificates issued on and after January 1, 1972, and prior to January 1, 1980, the minimum standard for the valuation of all such certificates shall be 4 percent per annum interest; and in the case of certificates issued on and after January 1, 1980, the minimum standard for the valuation of all single premium certificates shall be 512 percent per annum interest and for the valuation of all other such certificates shall be 412 percent per annum interest, and the following tables:

(1) For all ordinary certificates of life insurance issued on the standard basis, excluding any disability and accidental death benefits in such